it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Bevande > Bevande alcoliche > Liquori premiscelati e miscele per cocktail: Cocktail a base di birra; Preparazioni di mix di frutta; Hard Seltzer; Cocktail a base di liquori e alcolici; Preparazioni di mix di spezie; Cocktail a base di vino
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Napoje > Napoje alkoholowe > Gotowe mieszanki alkoholowe i koktajlowe: Koktajle na bazie piwa; Gotowe mieszanki owocowe; Hard Seltzer; Koktajle na bazie alkoholi; Mieszanki przypraw; Koktajle na bazie wina
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Ποτά > Αλκοολούχα ποτά > Έτοιμα μείγματα αλκοολούχων ποτών και κοκτέιλ: Κοκτέιλ με βάση τη μπύρα; Παρασκευάσματα μείγματος φρούτων; Σκληρά Seltzers; Κοκτέιλ με βάση αποστάγματα & αλκοολούχα ποτά; Μείγματα μπαχαρικών; Κοκτέιλ με βάση το κρασί
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Nápoje > Alkoholické nápoje > Predmiešané liehoviny a koktailové zmesi: Pivné koktaily; Prípravky ovocnej zmesi; Hard Seltzer; Koktaily s likérom a liehovinami; Prípravky koreninovej zmesi; Vínové koktaily
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcóolicas > Bebidas destiladas pré-misturadas e misturas para coquetéis: Coquetéis à base de cerveja; Preparados de mistura de frutas; Hard Seltzers; Coquetéis à base de licores e bebidas destiladas; Preparados de mistura de especiarias; Coquetéis à base de vinho
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Pića > Alkoholna pića > Gotova alkoholna pića i mješavine za koktele: Kokteli na bazi piva; Pripravci voćnih mješavina; Hard seltzer; Kokteli na bazi likera i rakije; Pripravci mješavine začina; Kokteli na bazi vina
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Getränke > Alkoholische Getränke > Vorgemischte Spirituosen und Cocktailmischgetränke: Cocktails auf Bierbasis; Zubereitungen mit Fruchtmischungen; Hard Seltzer; Cocktails auf Alkohol- und Spirituosenbasis; Zubereitungen mit Gewürzmischungen; Cocktails auf Weinbasis
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Juomat > Alkoholijuomat > Esisekoitetut väkevät alkoholijuomat ja cocktailseokset: Olutpohjaiset cocktailit; Hedelmäsekoitusvalmisteet; Alkoholipitoiset seltzerit; Likööriin ja väkevään alkoholiin perustuvat cocktailit; Maustesekoitusvalmisteet; Viinipohjaiset cocktailit
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Drycker > Alkoholhaltiga drycker > Sprit- och cocktailblandningar: Ölbaserade cocktails; Fruktblandningsförberedelser; Hårda Seltzers; Starkvin och spritbaserade cocktails; Kryddblandningsförberedelser; Vinbaserade cocktails
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Băuturi > Băuturi alcoolice > Băuturi spirtoase premixate și amestecuri pentru cocteiluri: Cocteiluri pe bază de bere; Preparate din amestecuri de fructe; Băuturi alcoolice carbogazificate; Cocteiluri pe bază de băuturi tari și spirtoase; Preparate din amestecuri de condimente; Cocteiluri pe bază de vin
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Напитки > Алкохолни напитки > Готови спиртни напитки и смеси за коктейли: Коктейли на основата на бира; Плодови смеси за коктейли; Хард зелцери; Коктейли на основата на силни алкохолни напитки; Подправъчни смеси за коктейли; Коктейли на винена основа
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 饮料/饮品 > 酒精饮料 > 预调烈酒和混合鸡尾酒: 啤酒鸡尾酒; 水果混合制剂; 硬苏打水; 酒类和烈酒鸡尾酒; 香料混合制剂; 葡萄酒鸡尾酒
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Beverages > Alcoholic Beverages > Premixed Spirits & Cocktail Mixes: Beer-Based Cocktails; Fruit Mix Preparations; Hard Seltzers; Liquor & Spirit-Based Cocktails; Spice Mix Preparations; Wine-Based Cocktails
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Alkollü ve Alkolsüz İçecekler > Alkollü İçecekler > Önceden Karıştırılmış Alkollü İçkiler ve Kokteyl Karışımları: Bira Bazlı Kokteyller; Meyve Karışımı Hazırlıkları; Sert Seltzerler; İçki ve Alkol Bazlı Kokteyller; Baharat Karışımı Hazırlıkları; Şarap Bazlı Kokteyller
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Italok > Alkoholos italok > Előkevert szeszes italok és koktélkeverékek: Sör alapú koktélok; Gyümölcsmix-készítmények; Kemény seltzerek; Likőr és szeszes ital alapú koktélok; Fűszerkeverék-készítmények; Bor alapú koktélok
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Pijače > Alkoholne pijače > Pripravljena žganja in mešanice za koktajle: Koktajli na osnovi piva; Pripravki iz sadnih mešanic; Gazirana alkoholna pijača; Koktajli na osnovi likerja in žganja; Pripravki iz mešanice začimb; Koktajli na osnovi vina
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Gėrimai > Alkoholiniai gėrimai > Iš anksto sumaišyti spiritiniai gėrimai ir kokteilių mišiniai: Kokteiliai alaus pagrindu; Paruošti vaisių mišiniai; Gazuoti alkoholiniai gėrimai; Kokteiliai stipriųjų alkoholinių gėrimų pagrindu; Paruošti prieskonių mišiniai; Kokteiliai vyno pagrindu
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Drinken > Alcoholische dranken > Voorgemixte sterke dranken en mixen voor cocktails: Cocktails op basis van bier; Bereidingen van fruitmixen; Hard seltzers; Cocktails op basis van likeur en sterke drank; Bereidingen van kruidenmixen; Cocktails op basis van wijn
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Nápoje > Alkoholické nápoje > Předmíchané destiláty a koktejlové směsi: Pivní koktejly; Přípravky z ovocných směsí; Hard Seltzery; Koktejly z lihovin a destilátů; Sady koření; Vinné koktejly
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Boissons > Boissons alcoolisées > Spiritueux prêts à boire et mélanges pour cocktails: Cocktails à base de bière; Préparations de mélanges de fruits; Seltzers alcoolisés; Cocktails à base d’alcool et de spiritueux; Préparations de mélanges d’épices; Cocktails à base de vin
ja: 食品・飲料 > 飲料 > アルコール飲料 > プレミックススピリッツ・カクテルミックス: ビールベースのカクテル; お酒用フルーツミックス; ハードセルツァー; リキュール・スピリッツベースのカクテル; スパイスミックス; ワインベースのカクテル
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Drikkevarer > Alkoholiske drikke > Forblandet spiritus og cocktailblandinger: Øl-baserede cocktails; Frugtblandinger; RTD-drinks; Likør- og spiritusbaserede cocktails; Krydderiblandinger; Vin-baserede cocktails
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > เครื่องดื่ม > เครื่องดื่มที่มีแอลกอฮอล์ > สุราผสมล่วงหน้าและค็อกเทลมิกซ์: ค็อกเทลจากเบียร์; การเตรียมส่วนผสมผลไม้; เครื่องดื่มแอลกอฮอล์อัดก๊าซ; สุราหวานและค็อกเทลจากสุรากลั่น; การเตรียมส่วนผสมเครื่องเทศ; ค็อกเทลจากไวน์
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcohólicas > Licores premezclados y mezclas para cócteles: Cócteles a base de cerveza; Preparaciones de mezclas de frutas; Hard Seltzers; Cócteles a base de licores y bebidas espirituosas; Preparaciones de mezclas de especias; Cócteles a base de vino
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Напитки > Алкогольные напитки > Алкогольные коктейли и смеси для коктейлей: Коктейли на основе пива; Смеси для коктейлей с фруктами; Хард-зельцеры; Коктейли на основе крепких алкогольных напитков; Смеси для коктейлей со специями; Коктейли на основе вина
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 飲料 > 酒精飲料 > 預調酒和調製雞尾酒: 啤酒雞尾酒; 調酒水果包; 硬性蘇打水; 烈酒雞尾酒; 調酒香料包; 葡萄酒雞尾酒
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Bebidas alcoólicas > Bebidas espirituosas pré-misturadas e misturas de cocktail: Cocktails à base de cerveja; Preparações de mistura de frutas; Hard Seltzers; Cocktails à base de licores e bebidas espirituosas; Preparações de mistura de especiarias; Cocktails à base de vinho
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Drikkevarer > Alkoholholdige drikkevarer > Ferdigblandede brennevins- og cocktailmikser: Ølbaserte cocktailer; Fruktmiksblandinger; Hard seltzer; Brennevinsbaserte cocktailer; Kryddermiksblandinger; Vinbaserte cocktailer
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 음료 > 주류 > 프리믹스 스피릿/칵테일 믹스: 맥주 베이스 칵테일; 과일 믹스; 하드셀처; 리큐어/스피릿 베이스 칵테일; 향신료 믹스; 와인 베이스 칵테일
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Đồ uống > Đồ uống có cồn > Hỗn hợp rượu mạnh & cocktail pha sẵn: Cocktail làm từ bia; Chế phẩm trộn trái cây; Nước uống có ga; Cocktail làm từ rượu và rượu mạnh; Chế phẩm trộn gia vị; Cocktail làm từ rượu vang